Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 8 Time for Trial

Cross references. —

As to assignment of cases for trial generally, see Rule 40, W.R.C.P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

75 Am. Jur. 2d Trial §§ 60 to 90.

88 C.J.S. Trial §§ 39 to 42, 60 to 63, 66 to 69, 71 to 90.

§ 1-8-101.
Trial docket.

The clerk shall make a trial docket on which shall appear all cases in which the issues have been joined. The cases shall be set for trial in the order in which they stand on the appearance docket. The clerk shall not place upon the trial docket any case in which nothing remains to be done except to execute an order for the sale of real or personal property, and to distribute the proceeds as directed by the order, but if it becomes necessary, the case may be redocketed upon the application of either party, whereupon it shall stand in all respects as if it had remained on the docket.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 183; R.S. 1887, § 2519; Laws 1895, ch. 39, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3606; C.S. 1910, § 4455; C.S. 1920, § 5725; R.S. 1931, § 89-1206; C.S. 1945, § 3-2106; W.S. 1957, § 1-64; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2019 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to docket of justice of peace court, see §

1-21-101

.

As to dockets of probate courts, see §§

2-2-201

and

2-2-202

.

As to dockets of circuit courts generally, see §

5-9-101

et seq.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "trial docket on which" for "trial docket on the first day of each term, on which" in the first sentence.

Entry by clerk presumed. —

In the absence of anything in the record to the contrary it will be presumed that a cause properly triable at the term in which it was heard was duly entered on the trial docket by the clerk, such being his duty under this section. Syndicate Improvement Co. v. Bradley, 6 Wyo. 171, 43 P. 79,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1896).

Record entry of judgment

in the trial court necessary for appeal could not be shown by entries under the trial docket for use of the trial judge under this section, such docket not being the journal entries, required for entry of judgment. Hahn v. Citizens' State Bank, 25 Wyo. 467, 171 P. 889, 172 P. 705,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1918).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Authority of trial judge to impose costs or other sanctions against attorney who fails to appear at, or proceed with, scheduled trial, 29 ALR4th 160.

§ 1-8-102.
Order of hearing.

All cases shall be heard
in the order in which they stand on the trial docket unless the court
otherwise directs. The court may hear a motion at any time and may
prescribe by rule the time of hearing motions.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 185; R.S. 1887, § 2521; R.S. 1899, § 3608; C.S. 1910, § 4457; C.S. 1920, § 5727; R.S. 1931, § 89-1208; C.S. 1945, § 3-2108; W.S. 1957, § 1-65; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision that actions for quo warranto shall have precedence over pending civil actions, see §

1-31-130

.

For provision authorizing advancement of case involving validity of Water and Sewer District Law or establishment of water and sewer districts, see §

41-10-146

.

For provision authorizing advancement on calendar of action for declaratory judgment, see Rule 57, W.R.C.P.

Cited

in

James v. Lederer-Strauss & Co., 32 Wyo. 377, 233 P. 137,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1925).

§ 1-8-103.
Copy of docket for bar.

The clerk shall make a copy of the trial docket for the use of the bar.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 187; R.S. 1887, § 2523; R.S. 1899, § 3614; C.S. 1910, § 4469; C.S. 1920, § 5739; R.S. 1931, § 89-1219; C.S. 1945, § 3-2110; W.S. 1957, § 1-67; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2019 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “use of the bar” for “use of the bar before the first day of the term.”